Hawaii statutes.
[§486K-7] Posting copy of law; damages
recoverable by guests. The keeper of every hotel shall post in a
conspicuous place in the office or public room and in every bedroom of the
hotel a printed copy of sections 486K-1 to 486K-8 and a statement of charge or
rate of charges by the day for lodging. No charge or sum shall be collected or
received by any keeper for any service not actually rendered, or for any item
not actually delivered or contracted for, or for any greater or other sum than
the keeper is entitled to by the general rules and regulations of the hotel.
For any intentional violation of this or any provision herein contained, the
offender shall forfeit to the injured party three times the amount of the sum
charged in excess of what the offender is entitled to. [L 1978, c 234, pt of
§3; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next